Vermont, session 2025-2026, H826.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTENT
It is the intent of the Vermont General Assembly to support the human right
to housing and to promote public health and community safety by preserving
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 2 of 14
affordable housing and creating new social and economic opportunities for the
development and maintenance of sustainable, resilient, and affordable housing
infrastructure. It is the intent of this act to focus State, municipal, and private
resources on ensuring that Vermonters have an adequate supply of safe, secure
housing, including more opportunities for access to and ownership of land and
community resources.
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) According to the Vermont Department of Health’s 2025 Vermont
State Health Improvement Plan 2025–2030, a five-year roadmap for ensuring
that all people and communities in Vermont have fair and sustainable access to
opportunities for health and well-being, “a comprehensive and coordinated
approach to programs, policies, and resources to increase affordable,
accessible, and safe housing is vital.” The first goal of the plan is to improve
the availability of affordable, accessible, and safe housing.
(2) The report’s findings show that Vermont’s statewide housing crisis
is deepening, and housing costs are stretching Vermonters’ budgets thin. The
report estimates that the pace of home building will need to increase to create
the 24,000–36,000 additional year-round homes needed in 2025–2029 to meet
demand, normalize vacancy rates, house the homeless, and replace homes lost
from the stock through flooding and other causes.
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 3 of 14
(3) The Cannabis Control Board’s 2025 Cannabis Control Board
Report: Proposal for Fees and Appropriations for Fiscal Year 2027
recommends community reinvestment through the Land Access and
Opportunity Board (LAOB). The report states that “it is well established that
stable housing is a cornerstone of healthy, safe and prosperous communities.
Investments in housing access and community reinvestment are thus both
economic and preventive public health measures. Investing in community-
leadership is an effective policy strategy for enduring benefits such as targeted
housing solutions, civic participation, community buy in, and wealth building.”
(4) The Cannabis Control Board’s 2025 Report to the General Assembly
Pursuant to 7 V.S.A. § 989 recommended allocating a portion of the cannabis
excise tax to the LAOB for community reinvestment in the following
initiatives:
(A) down payment assistance grants to support homeownership and
land access for disadvantaged Vermonters, such as:
(i) work in partnership to expand and complement existing down
payment assistance programs; and
(ii) development of Vermont’s first down payment assistance
grant to support farmland access for disadvantaged communities;
(B) financing and technical advising support for BIPOC and other
emerging developers;
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 4 of 14
(C) seed and implementation grants for community-led affordable
housing and community development projects, including land trusts and land
banks; and
(D) strengthening community leadership of disadvantaged
communities through advisory powers and community engagement, such as:
(i) allocating resources to strengthen and sustain community-led
initiatives;
(ii) supporting underrepresented community members’
participation in public policy processes with stipends, child care, travel costs,
and language access; and
(iii) advising regarding public policies and programming on how
to dismantle ongoing barriers that prevent the participation and benefit of
disadvantaged communities.
(5) 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 69, Sec. 5 required the State Housing
and Residential Services Planning Committee to “create an actionable plan to
develop housing for individuals with developmental disabilities that reflects
the diversity of needs expressed by those individuals and their families,
including individuals with high-support needs who require 24-hour care and
those with specific communication needs.” The State Housing and Residential
Services Planning Committee’s 2025 report The Road Home: A Plan for
Creating Permanent, Affordable, and Service-Supported Housing for
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 5 of 14
Vermonters Who Participate in Developmental Disabilities Services describes
that “as the LAOB has built out its programs, it has taken a broad view of their
charge, recognizing that ownership starts with basic access. The LAOB Co-
Directors have partnered with the parent-led Developmental Disabilities
Housing Initiative to understand the significant barriers that stand between
people with [intellectual and developmental disabilities] and the safe,
affordable and service-supported homes where they want to live. The LAOB
is in the process of developing three positions for housing navigators. Each
navigator will be assigned to a specific population that lacks equitable access
to housing and housing programs. The navigator’s role will include both
individual client assistance and systems change work.”
(6) According to the Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund’s 2024 Food
Security in Vermont: Roadmap to 2035, a 10-year plan to achieve food
security in Vermont by 2035, it is necessary to integrate food access into town
plans across Vermont. The report states, “municipal and regional planning
tools can integrate food access with other socioeconomic issues, such as
housing and transportation, that influence food security for communities and
individuals.” The report also recommends that “conservation objectives must
be guided by the findings of the Vermont Truth and Reconciliation
Commission, and the recommendations of the Land Access and Opportunity
Board (LAOB). … Strategies to remove barriers to farm ownership, provide
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 6 of 14
direct payments to farmers, and update our food supply chain infrastructure
must go together with land conservation.”
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 5 is amended to read:
Subchapter 5. Land Access and Opportunity Board
§ 325t. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Board” means the Vermont Land Access and Opportunity Board.
(2) “Fund” means the Land Access and Opportunity Fund.
(3) “Historically marginalized or disadvantaged community” means a
community that has historically suffered from discrimination and has not had
equal access to public or private economic benefits due to the race, ethnicity,
gender, geography, language preference, immigrant or citizen status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, socioeconomic status, or disability status of its
members.
(3)(4) “LGBTQ” means an individual who identifies as lesbian, gay,
bisexual, transgender, queer, or questioning.
(4)(5) “VHCB” means the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board.
* * *
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 7 of 14
§ 325w. LAND ACCESS AND OPPORTUNITY FUND; REPORT
(a) There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the
“Land Access and Opportunity Fund.” The Fund shall be administered by the
Board.
(b) Expenditures from the Fund shall only be made to implement and
effectuate the purposes of this subchapter. Unexpended balances and any
earnings shall remain in the Fund for use in accord with the purposes of this
subchapter.
(c) Upon application from an eligible applicant in a form prescribed by the
Board, the Board may provide funding in the form of grants or loans for the
following eligible activities:
(1) the purchase of buildings and land by current tenants to expand
access to owner-occupied housing;
(2) the renovation of owner-occupied multiunit housing to expand
access to housing;
(3) the development of housing infrastructure for land owned through a
residential cooperative or other form of collective ownership; and
(4) the development of transitional housing.
(d) The Board shall prioritize funding for projects that:
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 8 of 14
(1) create self-sufficient neighborhoods and communities that use
intersectional and circular design, such as localized waste management,
regenerative agricultural practices, and independent energy generation;
(2) develop sustainable social and physical infrastructure that expands
access to community resources, such as tool banks, labor pools, workforce
training programs, disaster relief, and other resilience strategies; and
(3) support members from historically marginalized or disadvantaged
communities, including individuals who experience homelessness, substance
use disorder, or mental or physical disabilities; individuals who have a history
of incarceration or involvement in the justice system; youth with a history of
interaction with the Department for Children and Families; the elderly; or the
agricultural workforce.
(e) The Board shall work with the Vermont Housing and Finance Agency,
the VHCB, the Agency of Human Services, the Department of Housing and
Community Development, the Vermont Economic Progress Council, and
others to identify and propose pilot projects to be awarded funding under this
section that:
(1) identify public land and buildings in areas designated for the
development of housing to integrate housing for members from historically
marginalized or disadvantaged communities into neighborhoods and
communities;
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 9 of 14
(2) support cooperative management or ownership;
(3) integrate community resources;
(4) colocate health resources, workforce development opportunities, or
food access;
(5) provide for circular waste management and energy production and
storage within the project or neighborhood; and
(6) propose additional incentives for public-private partnerships and
coordinated development of the neighborhood surrounding the housing
infrastructure.
(f)(1) Annually on or before January 31, the Board shall submit a report
concerning its activities under this section to the Governor and the General
Assembly. The report shall include a list and description of the activities
funded by the Board during the preceding year, including commitments made
to fund projects, and a full financial report of the Board’s activities.
(2) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the report to be made under this section.
Sec. 4. PRESERVATION OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING TAX REPORT
On or before July 1, 2027, the Department of Taxes in collaboration with
the Joint Fiscal Office shall issue a report to the General Assembly evaluating
the tax incentives and penalties that purport to preserve affordable housing in
Vermont. The report shall:
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 10 of 14
(1) consider various definitions and measurements of affordability for
tenants, including the basic needs budget;
(2) consider variables impacting the price of rent for property owners,
including the cost and benefits of rent pricing;
(3) project how tax incentives for affordable rent might amplify existing
tax benefits for owners;
(4) project how tax penalties on rent prices would deter owners from
charging excessive rent prices;
(5) project how tax incentives for property owners giving tenants the
right of first refusal to purchase property under rent or allowing rent-to-own
could encourage homeownership for tenants;
(6) recommend options and opportunities to provide advantageous tax
treatment to properties owned by Vermonters from historically marginalized or
disadvantaged communities; and
(7) project the fiscal impact of these various tax incentives and penalties
on the revenues of the State.
Sec. 5. LAND SECURITY WORKING GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Land Security Working Group.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 11 of 14
(1) one member, appointed by the Vermont Land Access and
Opportunity Board;
(2) one member, appointed by the Land Use Review Board;
(3) one member, appointed by the Vermont Association of Planning and
Development Agencies;
(4) the Director of Racial Equity or designee;
(5) the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development or
designee;
(6) one member with knowledge of Act 250 and its impacts on
marginalized communities, appointed by the Housing and Homelessness
Alliance of Vermont;
(7) one member from the Farm to Plate Network with knowledge about
food security and agricultural lands, appointed by the Vermont Sustainable
Jobs Fund;
(8) the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee;
(9) one member with knowledge of affordable housing and marginalized
communities, appointed by the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board;
(10) one member with knowledge about housing development funding,
appointed by the Vermont Housing Finance Agency;
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 12 of 14
(11) one member with knowledge about the housing experiences and
needs of marginalized communities, appointed by the Vermont Racial Justice
Alliance;
(12) one member with knowledge about the housing experiences and
needs of marginalized communities, appointed by the Vermont Professionals
of Color Network;
(13) one member with knowledge about the housing experiences and
needs of marginalized communities, appointed by Migrant Justice;
(14) one member, appointed by the Developmental Disabilities Housing
Initiative;
(15) one member with knowledge of and experience with housing-
related matters, appointed by Vermont Legal Aid;
(16) one member with knowledge and experience about land-based
community development, appointed by the Vermont Association of
Conservation Districts;
(17) one member, appointed by Vermont Community Action
Partnership; and
(18) one member with knowledge and experience about the impacts of
zoning and land access laws on marginalized communities from the Civil
Rights and Environmental Justice Unit, appointed by the Secretary of Natural
Resources.
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 13 of 14
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall provide an assessment
and recommendations regarding:
(1) disparate economic and environmental justice impacts of Vermont’s
land use and conservation policies and regulations, including Act 250, 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 181, and other relevant policies; and
(2) identification and protection of agricultural land for community food
security purposes.
(d) Report. On or before December 15, 2026, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the General Assembly with its findings and any
recommendations for legislative action.
(e) Meetings.
(1) The Director of Racial Equity, or designee, shall call the first
meeting of the Working Group to occur on or before July 15, 2026.
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on January 20, 2027.
(f) Compensation. Members of the Working Group not otherwise
compensated for participation in the Working Group shall be eligible to per
diem compensation as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than 10
VT LEG #386236 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.826
2026 Page 14 of 14
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
Land Access and Opportunity Board.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386236 v.1